Missouri, session 2026, SB1148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 313.055 and 313.057, RSMo, are
repealed and one new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as section 313.057, to read as follows:
313.057. 1. It is unlawful for any person, either as
an owner, lessee or employee, to operate, carry on, conduct
or maintain any form of manufacturing, selling, leasing or
distribution of any bingo equipment or supplies without
having first procured and maintained a Missouri bingo
equipment and supplies manufacturer or supplier license.
2. The commission shall submit two sets of
fingerprints for each key person, as defined in commission
rules and regulations, of an entity or organization seeking
issuance or renewal of a Missouri bingo equipment and
supplies manufacturer or supplier license, for the purpose
of checking the person's prior criminal history when the
commission determines a nationwide check is warranted. The
fingerprint cards and any required fees shall be sent to the
Missouri state highway patrol's criminal records division.
The first set of fingerprints shall be used for searching
the state repository of criminal history information. The
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1148 2
second set of fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Identification Division, for the
searching of the federal criminal history files. The patrol
shall notify the commission of any criminal history
information or lack of criminal history information
discovered on the individual. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 610.120, all records related to any
criminal history information discovered shall be accessible
and available to the commission.
3. The holder of a state bingo license may, within two
years of cessation of conducting bingo or upon specific
approval by the commission, dispose of by sale in a manner
approved by the commission, any or all of his bingo
equipment and supplies, without a supplier's license. In
case of foreclosure of a lien by a bank or other person
holding a security interest for which bingo equipment is
security in whole or in part for the lien, the commission
may authorize the disposition of the bingo equipment without
requiring a supplier's license.
4. Any person whom the commission determines to be a
suitable person to receive a license pursuant to the
provisions of this section may be issued a manufacturer's or
supplier's license. The commission may require suppliers to
post a bond with the commission in an amount and in the
manner prescribed by the commission. The burden of proving
his qualification to receive or hold a license pursuant to
this section is at all times on the applicant or licensee.
5. The commission shall charge and collect from each
applicant for a supplier's license a one-time application
fee set by the commission, not to exceed five thousand
dollars. The commission shall charge and collect an annual
renewal fee for each supplier licensee not to exceed one

SB 1148 3
thousand dollars. The applicant shall be responsible for
the total cost of the criminal history investigation. If
the cost of the investigation exceeds the total amount of
fees filed by the applicant in this subsection, the
commission may assess additional fees as it deems
appropriate.
6. The commission shall charge and collect from each
applicant for a manufacturer's license a one-time
application fee set by the commission, not to exceed five
thousand dollars. The commission shall charge and collect
an annual renewal fee for each manufacturer licensee not to
exceed one thousand dollars. The applicant shall be
responsible for the total cost of the criminal history
investigation. If the cost of the investigation exceeds the
total amount of fees filed by the applicant in this
subsection, the commission may assess additional fees as it
deems appropriate.
7. The commission shall charge and collect from each
applicant for a hall provider's license a one-time
application fee set by the commission, not to exceed seven
hundred fifty dollars. The commission shall charge and
collect an annual renewal fee for each hall provider
licensee not to exceed five hundred dollars.
8. All licenses issued pursuant to this section shall
be issued for the calendar year and shall expire on December
thirty-first of each year. Regardless of the date of
application or issuance of the license, the fee to be
charged and collected pursuant to this section shall be the
full annual fee.
9. All license fees collected pursuant to this section
shall be paid over immediately to the state treasurer to be
deposited to the credit of the gaming commission fund.

SB 1148 4
10. All licensees pursuant to this section shall
maintain for a period of not less than three years full and
complete records of all business carried on in this state
and shall make same available for inspection to any duly
authorized representative of the commission. If a supplier
does not receive payment in full from an organization within
thirty days of the delivery of bingo supplies, the supplier
shall notify the commission in writing, or in a manner
specified by the commission in its rules and regulations, of
the delinquency. Upon receipt of the notice of delinquency,
the commission shall notify all suppliers that until further
notice from the commission, all sales of bingo supplies to
the delinquent organizations shall be on a cash-only basis.
Upon receipt of the notice from the commission, no supplier
may extend credit to the delinquent organization until such
time as the commission approves credit sales. If a
manufacturer does not receive payment in full from a
supplier within ninety days of the delivery of bingo
100 supplies, the manufacturer shall notify the commission in
101 writing, or in a manner specified by the commission in its
102 rules and regulations, of the delinquency. Upon receipt of
103 the notice of delinquency, the commission shall notify all
104 manufacturers that until further notice from the commission,
105 all sales of bingo supplies to the delinquent supplier shall
106 be on a cash-only basis. Upon receipt of the notice from
107 the commission, no manufacturer may extend credit to the
108 delinquent supplier until such time as the commission
109 approves credit sales.
110 11. [Until January 1, 1995, all suppliers shall pay a
111 tax on all pull-tab cards distributed by them in the amount
112 of ten dollars per box when sold by any organization
113 licensed to conduct bingo pursuant to the provisions of

SB 1148 5
114 sections 313.005 to 313.080. No box sold shall contain more
115 than twenty-four hundred pull-tab cards. Beginning January
116 1, 1995, a tax is hereby imposed in the amount of two
117 percent of the gross receipts of the retail sales value
118 charged for each pull-tab card sold in Missouri to be paid
119 by the supplier. The taxes, less two percent of the total
120 amount paid which may be retained by the supplier, if timely
121 filed and paid, shall be paid on a monthly basis to the
122 commission by each supplier of pull-tabs and shall be due on
123 the last day of each month following the month in which the
124 pull-tabs were sold. The taxes shall be deposited in the
125 state treasury, credited to the bingo proceeds for education
126 fund.] All pull-tab cards sold by suppliers in this state
127 shall bear on the face thereof the amount for which such
128 pull-tab cards will be sold. Each unit container shall
129 contain cards printed in such a manner as to ensure that at
130 least sixty percent of the gross revenues generated by the
131 ultimate sale of such cards shall be returned to the final
132 purchasers of such cards. [Any supplier who fails to pay
133 the tax imposed pursuant to this subsection shall have his
134 license issued pursuant to this section revoked and shall be
135 guilty of a class A misdemeanor.]
[313.055. 1. A tax is hereby imposed on
each organization conducting the game of bingo
which awards to winners of bingo games prizes or
merchandise having an aggregate retail value of
more than five thousand dollars annually and
more than one hundred dollars in any single
day. The tax shall be in the amount of two-
tenths of one cent upon each bingo card and
progressive bingo game card sold in Missouri to
be paid by the supplier. The taxes, less two
percent of the total amount paid which may be
retained by the supplier, shall be paid on a
monthly basis to the commission, by each

SB 1148 6
supplier of bingo supplies and shall be due on
the last day of the month following the month in
which the bingo card was sold, with the date of
sale being the date on the invoice evidencing
the sale, along with such reports as may be
required by the commission. The taxes shall be
deposited in the state treasury, credited to the
bingo proceeds for education fund.
2. All taxes not paid to the commission by
the person or licensee required to remit the
same on the date when the same becomes due and
payable to the commission under the provisions
of sections 313.005 to 313.085 shall bear
interest at the rate to be set by the commission
not to exceed two percent per calendar month, or
fraction thereof, from and after such date until
paid. In addition, the commission may impose a
penalty not to exceed three times the amount of
taxes due for failure to submit the reports
required by this section and pay the taxes due.]
✓